Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 13.2 Comparison Price Advertising for Precious Metal and Stones

6-13.2-1.
Declaration of policy.

Price comparison advertising is a form of advertising commonly used in the sale or offering for sale of precious metals and stones whereby current prices are compared with former or future prices or other stated values to demonstrate price reductions or cost savings. While price comparisons accurately reflecting market values in the trade area provide consumers with useful information in making value comparisons and market buying decisions, price comparisons based on arbitrary or inflated prices or values can only serve to deceive or mislead. Further abuse occurs when sellers fail to disclose material information essential to consumer understanding of the comparisons made.

The use of arbitrary or inflated price comparisons in violation of this rule as an inducement to the sale of precious metals and stones is injurious to both the consuming public and competitors, and is an unfair trade practice and unfair method of competition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 408, § 1.

6-13.2-2.
Definitions.

The following words as used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is required by the context or is specifically prescribed, shall have the following meanings:

“Advertisement” means any oral, written, or graphic statement or representation made in connection with the solicitation of business in any manner for the purpose of soliciting a consumer in this state by a seller and includes, without limitation because of enumeration, statements and representations, but does not include price tags or in-store signs, or printed in any sales literature or brochure excepting catalogs. The terms “producer”, “manufacturer”, “wholesaler”, “importer”, or words of similar meaning, mean sellers engaged in resales, not sellers of products or services for consumer, personal, family, or household use or consumption. No price comparison may be made by a seller for precious metal and stones at wholesale, wholesale prices, factory prices, or the like. If the prices for the sale being offered are the net-cost prices retailers usually and customarily pay when they buy that merchandise for resale, sales may be termed net-cost sales and in that event sellers may advertise cost prices providing the substantiation of net-cost prices that are maintained for six (6) months. In no event may retailers, in their departments that sell precious metals or stones, hold themselves or their sale out as wholesalers or as wholesale prices or otherwise;

“Consumer property” means precious metals and stones sold primarily for personal, family, gift, or household use and not for resale or for use or consumption in a trade or business. For purposes of this chapter, “consumer property” includes “merchandise”;

“Date”, as applied to “date on which a price comparison is stated in the advertisement” in newspapers or other printed publications, means either the date of publication or distribution or the date on which the completed advertising copy is submitted to the printer for final printing and publication, provided the submission date does not exceed thirty (30) days from the date of actual publication or distribution;

“Precious metal” means metals that are prized because of chemical and physical properties (notably resistant to corrosion, hardness, strength, and beauty) desirable in jewelry, coinage, and objects of art, and that are at the same time relatively rare or inexpensive. Gold, silver, and the six (6) metals of the platinum group are usually considered precious metals;

“Precious stones” means one of the three (3) traditional categories of natural gemstones, the most valuable, as distinguished from semi-precious and decorative. Diamond, ruby, emerald, sapphire and pearl have long been considered “precious,” but, in accordance with their spiraling prices, alexandrite, black opal, cat’s eye, demantoid, and jadeite are included in this category;

“Price comparison” means the comparison, whether or not expressed wholly or in part in dollars, cents, fractions or percentages, in an advertisement of a seller’s current price for consumer property or services with any other price or statement of value for consumer property, whether or not these prices are actually stated in the advertisement; or, the making of price reductions claims or savings claims with respect to the seller’s current price. The term includes, but shall not be limited to, such comparisons as “fifty percent off ”; “up to seventy percent off ”; “save one-third”; “half-price” sale; “thirty percent to seventy percent off ”; “was twenty dollars, now half price”; “ten-dollar value, now eight dollars”; “was seven dollars now six dollars”; “list price fifty dollars our price twenty-nine dollars”; “clearance price”; or “liquidation price”;

“Sale” means a reduction from the seller’s price at which consumer property is offered to the public for a fixed period of time; and

“Seller” means a person engaged in the sale of consumer property and includes individuals, corporations, partnerships, associations, and any other form of business organization or entity. The term shall not include banks, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, and public utilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 11.

6-13.2-3.
Records of fact.

Any seller advertising products or services in Rhode Island for the purpose of soliciting a consumer in this state in which these advertisements contain representations of statements as to any type of saving claims, including reduced price claims and comparative value claims, shall maintain, for six (6) months, adequate records that disclose the factual basis for these representations or statements and from which the validity of any claims can be established.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 11.

6-13.2-4.
Price comparison — General.

It shall be an unfair or deceptive act or practice for a seller to make any price comparison:

Based upon a price other than one at which the consumer property was either sold or offered for sale by the seller or a competitor, or will be sold or offered for sale by the seller in the future, in the regular course of business in the trade area in which the price comparison is made;

In which the consumer property materially differs in composition; grade or quality; style or design; model; name or brand; kind or variety; or service and performance characteristics; unless the general nature of the material differences is conspicuously disclosed in the advertisement with the price comparison, or the class of property being offered is similar to but is of superior quality grade, materials, or draftsmanship than the consumer property to which the seller is comparing its product; or

Unless all the material price terms and conditions of any offer that are based upon the purchase of other merchandise are conspicuously disclosed. Those types of offers shall include, but are not limited to “free”; “two for one”; “two-fer”; “half-price sale”; “one cent sale”; “fifty percent off ”; or other similar type of offer.

No price comparison under this section may be made by a seller based on a price that exceeds his or her cost plus normal markup regularly used by him or her in the sale of that property, or consumer property or services of like kind.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 11.

6-13.2-5.
Price comparison advertisements.

It shall be an unfair or deceptive act or practice for a seller to advertise or make any price comparison:

Based upon a price at which consumer property was sold by the seller unless:

The price is a price at which the consumer property was actually sold in substantial quantities by the seller in the last ninety (90) days immediately preceding the date on which the price comparison is stated in the advertisement; or

The price is a price at which the consumer property was actually sold in substantial quantities by the seller during any other period and the advertisement discloses with the price comparison the date, time, or seasonal period when the sales were made.

Based upon a price at which the seller has offered for sale but has not sold consumer property unless:

The price is the price at which the consumer property was actually offered for sale by the seller for at least four (4) weeks during the last ninety (90) days immediately preceding the date on which the price comparison is stated in the advertisement; or

The price is a price at which the consumer property was actually offered for sale by the seller for at least four (4) weeks during any other ninety-day (90) period and the advertisement clearly discloses the date, time, or seasonal period of that offer.

In which the seller represents that the seller is conducting a “sale” unless:

The termination date of the “sale” is clearly stated in the advertisement; except that this disclosure shall not apply to “clearance”, “closeouts”, “permanent markdown”, or “special purchases” with limited quantities and are advertised as such; and

The day after the “sale” ends, the consumer property reverts in price to the price charged by the seller for the item before the “sale” began or to a price that is higher than the “sale” price, except for “clearance”, “closeout”, or “permanent markdown” sales where the item will be reduced in price until it is removed from sale.

Referencing a higher price at which consumer property will be offered or sold in the future unless:

The advertisement clearly discloses that the price comparison is based upon a future price increase;

The effective date of the future higher price, if more than ninety (90) days after the price comparison is first stated in an advertisement, is clearly disclosed in the advertisement; and

The future higher price increase takes effect on the date disclosed in the advertisement or, if not disclosed in the advertisement, within ninety (90) days after the price comparison is stated in the advertisement, except where compliance becomes impossible because of circumstances beyond the seller’s control.

Based upon advertised savings of a particular percentage or a range of percentages (e.g., “save thirty percent” or “twenty percent to sixty percent off”) unless:

The minimum percent reduction is clearly stated in the advertisement in the manner as conspicuously as the maximum percentage reduction, when applicable;

The basis other than a regular price comparison for the advertised percentage reduction is clearly and conspicuously disclosed in the advertisement.

Based upon the use of the term “original” or “originally”, to fail to disclose that intermediate markdowns have been taken, if that is the case. A seller may use the term “original” or “originally”, when offering a reduction from an original price that was the price at which the consumer property was actually offered for sale in the recent, regular course of business. If the comparative price, identified as “original” or “originally”, is not also the last, previous selling price, that fact shall be disclosed by stating the last, previous selling price, (e.g., “originally $ 599.95, formerly $ 499.95, now $ 399.95”) or indicating “intermediate markdowns taken”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 11.

6-13.2-6.
Competitor’s prices.

It shall be an unfair or deceptive act or practice for a seller to make any price comparison:

Based upon a competitor’s price unless:

The competitor’s price is either a price at which the competitor sold or advertised consumer property for sale at any time within the ninety-day (90) period immediately preceding the date on which the price comparison is stated in the advertisement, or the date on which the completed advertising copy was submitted to the printer for final printing and publication, provided each submission date does not exceed eight (8) weeks from the date of actual publication or distribution;

The competitor’s price is a price that is representative of prices at which the consumer property is sold or advertised for sale in the trade area in which the price comparison is made and is not an isolated price; or

Disclosure is made with the price comparison that the price used as a basis for the comparison was not the seller’s own price.

Based upon a “manufacturer’s suggested price”; “distributor’s suggested price”; “list price”; “suggested retail”, or any similar term implying a suggested or list price established by anyone other than the seller, unless either:

The seller has actually offered and sold the consumer property for sale at the suggested price as its regular price; or

The seller can substantiate that it is the actual price at which the consumer property was being offered for sale by representative retailers in the trade area in which the claim is made at any time within the ninety-day (90) period immediately preceding either the date on which the price comparison is stated in the advertisement; the comparative price is for property of same composition, grade or quality, style or design, model, name or brand, kind or variety; or the date on which the completed advertising copy was submitted to the printer for final printing and publication, provided the submission date does not exceed eight (8) weeks from the date of actual publication or distribution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 11.

6-13.2-7.
Retail price labels.

A price label or tag permanently imprinted on or affixed to consumer property or its container by the manufacturer or supplier (“preticketed price”) and not under control of the retail seller or instigated by him or her or that is required to be attached to consumer property under federal law, need not be covered, obliterated, or removed for purposes of compliance with this statute, unless that item was actually sold at that labeled price in not insubstantial quantities on a substantial basis:

When the retail seller’s current offering price is attached to, printed on, or placed on a label, tag, or sign accompanying the consumer property, provided no price comparison is made by the retail seller based solely on the manufacturer’s price thereon unless the comparison would be valid based on past sales records; or

When the retail seller’s original offering price attached to, printed on, or placed on a label, tag, or sign accompanying the consumer property, is identical to the preticketed price.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 11.

6-13.2-8.
Penalty — Enforcement.

Whoever violates the provisions of this chapter may be enjoined from doing so by an action brought by the attorney general, or any aggrieved party, and shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) for each separate advertised infraction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 408, § 1.